Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.732

[Art. 103] Captured or abandoned property.

(1) All persons subject to this code shall secure all public property taken from the enemy for the service of the United States, and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority without delay all captured or abandoned property in their possession, custody, or control.

(2) Any person subject to this code who:

(a) Fails to carry out the duties prescribed in subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Buys, sells, trades, or in any way deals in or disposes of captured or abandoned property, whereby he or she receives or expects any profit, benefit, or advantage to himself or herself or another directly or indirectly connected with himself or herself; or

(c) Engages in looting or pillaging;

shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 785; 1963 c 220 s 102.]